Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 15.1 Guardianship of Minors

33-15.1-1.
Parents as joint natural guardians — Releases.

The father and mother shall be the joint natural guardians of their minor children and shall be equally charged with their care, nurture, welfare and education; and they may be sued either jointly or separately for the support of their minor children. To the extent that any such minor child has property or an estate of his or her own, or that there is income or principal of any trust for his or her benefit, which may be used to provide the child with an education in a college, university or private school, the natural guardians shall not be obligated either jointly or separately to provide an education. The foregoing sentence shall not be deemed to create by implication any obligation to provide an education where none would otherwise exist. The natural guardians shall have equal powers and rights and neither shall have any right paramount to the right of the other concerning the custody of the minor children, and both shall be entitled to their services, and to their earnings, the payment of which to either parent shall be a valid and sufficient discharge to the employer of the children until after notice in writing has been given to him or her by both or either of the parents of their intention to both claim the earnings. Provided, however, this section and §

33-15.1-3

shall not affect the right of a probate court duly to appoint a legal guardian of the person and estate, or of the person or estate of any minor children, or the right of any court in the state, in any suit or proceedings duly brought or heard in the court, to make any order, decree, decision or judgment regarding the care, custody, education, estate or otherwise of any minor children, in which event the appointment of the probate court and the order, decree, decision or judgment of any other court shall supersede the natural guardianship insofar as the same shall be inconsistent with the appointment, order, decree, decision or judgment.

A release given by both parents or by a parent or guardian who has the legal custody of a minor child or by a guardian or adult spouse of a minor spouse shall, where the amount of the release does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value, be valid and binding upon the minor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-2.
Guardianship for education — Educational advocates for children with disabilities under the care and custody of the state.

Whenever the family court places a child in the care and custody of the state, it shall enter an order indicating whether the parents or guardian are to be allowed to continue to make educational decisions on behalf of the child. At the same time, the family court shall make a factual determination pursuant to §

16-64-1

as to the residence of the child’s parent(s) or guardian on the date that the child is placed in the care and custody of the state, subject to §

16-64-6

. Thereafter, while the child is in the care of the state, the director of DCYF shall have the duty to update the child’s parent’s residence in accordance with §

42-72.4-1

. If the family court enters an order vesting the right to control a child’s education with a state agency, and if the court or the state agency finds that the child is in need of special education, or that the child is suspected of being in need of special education, the court or state agency shall request the commissioner of elementary and secondary education to appoint an educational advocate to exercise the child’s due process rights under applicable state and federal special education laws and regulations. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall also have the power to appoint an educational advocate when a child’s parents or guardian cannot be identified or when the whereabouts of a parent cannot be determined. If a parent is identified or the whereabouts of the parent become known, then the commissioner shall terminate the appointment of the educational advocate. An educational advocate, acting in good faith, shall be immune from any liability resulting from the performance of his or her duties as an educational advocate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 68, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 77; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 77.

33-15.1-3.
No preference between parents.

In any proceedings or suit in any court, neither parent shall have any natural priority or preference in any matter relating to their minor children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-4.
Power of probate court to appoint guardians.

The probate court in each city or town, if occasion shall require, shall have power to appoint or approve guardians of the persons and estates, or of the person or estate of minors who shall reside, or have a legal settlement in the city or town, and of the estate within the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-4.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 326, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 299, § 1, effective July 5, 2008; P.L. 2008, ch. 419, § 1, effective July 8, 2008.

33-15.1-5.
Appointment of guardians for minors.

A probate court may appoint a guardian of a minor under the age of fourteen (14) years. A minor of the age of fourteen (14) years or over may nominate his or her own guardian, who, if approved by the probate court, shall be appointed accordingly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-6.
Appointment in lieu of guardian nominated by minor.

If a minor of the age of fourteen (14) years shall neglect to choose a guardian when cited by the court to do so, or shall choose one whom the court does not approve, or one who shall neglect to give bond as required by the court or by law, the court may appoint a guardian in the same manner as if the minor were under the age of fourteen (14) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-7.
Testamentary appointment of guardian for minor children.

Every person authorized by law to make a will may appoint by will, subject to the approval of the probate court, a guardian or guardians for his or her minor children, whether born at the time of making the will or afterwards, to continue during the minority of the children or for a less time; provided, that, in the case of husband and wife, the survivor, being otherwise qualified, shall be guardian of their children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-8.
Nonresident as guardian of minor.

A nonresident shall not be appointed or approved as guardian of a minor resident in this state, but this provision shall not apply to a testamentary guardian.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-9.
Guardian of estate of nonresident.

The probate court of any town may appoint or approve a guardian of the estate of a person who resides outside this state and has an estate in the town and has no guardian in this state and who, if a resident, would be liable to be put under guardianship under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-10.
Notice on ward for appointment of guardian of person.

No person shall be appointed guardian of the person of another, unless notice of the application for the appointment has been served upon the intended ward in person at least fourteen (14) days prior to any action on the application. Provided, if the intended ward is a minor under the age of twelve (12) years, in lieu of personal service, notice may be served upon any of the next of kin of the ward, or other interested person or friend, as the court may direct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-11.
Notice to spouse, children or heirs at law of ward.

No petition for guardianship of a minor shall be heard and no person shall be appointed guardian of the person or estate of another unless notice of the application for appointment together with notice of the date, time and place set for hearing has been given to the prospective ward’s spouse, children, and/or heirs at law who would inherit the prospective ward’s estate pursuant to the terms of §

33-1-1

.

Notice shall be given by the petitioner or his or her attorney at least ten (10) days before the date set for hearing on the petition by regular mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the prospective ward’s spouse and children at their last known addresses, or, if there be no children, then to the prospective ward’s heirs at law next in line (under the rules of descent) as set forth in §

33-1-1

only at their last known address. The petitioner or his or her attorney shall at or prior to the hearing, file or leave to be filed an affidavit that notice was given setting forth the names and post office addresses of the persons to whom the notice was sent and the date of mailing thereof, together with a copy of the notice.

Should the petitioner have no knowledge of the existence or whereabouts of any children or of any heir at law, an affidavit to that effect filed with the court shall satisfy this notice requirement.

Notwithstanding any notice requirement of the petitioner, the court shall give notice of the petition by advertisement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-12.
Expense of prosecuting or defending against petition.

If a guardian is appointed for any person liable to be put under guardianship under the provisions of this chapter, the court shall make an allowance to be paid by the guardian, for all reasonable expenses incurred in prosecuting or in defending against the petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-13.
Exemption of welfare agencies from costs and bond.

In any petition for the appointment of a guardian filed by the director of public welfare of any city or town, or the directors of the department of human services and behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or one designated by them in which the director or agent certifies that the petition is filed for the purpose of enabling the ward, who is without funds, to receive assistance from funds which are financed in whole or in part by federal grants, the director or the director’s agent, as petitioner, shall not be required to pay court fees or to give surety on his or her bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-14.
Appointment of temporary guardian.

The probate court for cause shown after any notice as it shall direct, pending any application for the appointment of a guardian, or pending any appeal from a decree appointing a guardian, may, if it shall deem proper, appoint a temporary guardian of the person and estate, or of the person or estate of the respondent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-15.
Tenure of temporary guardian.

A temporary guardian shall hold his or her office until the question of appointment of a guardian be decided, or until he or she shall be discharged by the court of probate; and from the appointment of a temporary guardian there shall be no appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-16.
Powers of temporary guardian — Bond.

Every temporary guardian appointed as provided in §

33-15.1-14

shall have the care and custody of the person of his or her ward and the management of the estate of his or her ward, or care and custody of the person of his or her ward, or management of the estate of his or her ward, as the case may be, until he or she shall be legally discharged; and he or she shall give bond to the probate court in like manner, and with like condition, as is required of guardians.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-17.
Inventory and appraisement of estate.

Within thirty (30) days after his or her appointment, or such longer time as may be allowed by the probate court, a guardian shall return to the probate court, under oath, an inventory and appraisement of all the real and personal estate of his or her ward, to be made by a suitable, disinterested person or persons appointed by the court, which shall fix the number of appraisers at one or three (3) in its discretion. The appraisers shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of their trust.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-18.
Statements of claims against estate.

Creditors of a ward shall file statements of their claims in the office of the probate clerk. Those claims filed within six (6) months, if allowed or proved, shall be preferred in payment over all claims subsequently filed. Claims filed after six (6) months shall be payable only out of the surplus property remaining in the hands of the guardian after paying claims filed within such time and all expenses and all allowances made by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-19.
Demands payable in future.

All legal demands against the ward, although due at a future day, may be filed and be payable with other claims, deducting interest for the anticipated payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-20.
Addresses of creditors — Affidavit to support claim.

Every creditor shall file his or her post office address in the office of the probate clerk, and, if requested, an affidavit in support of his or her claim, in the same manner as is provided in the case of claims against estates of deceased persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-21.
Application of personal property to debts — Priority of claims.

A guardian shall collect all the personal property of his or her ward and sell and apply the personal property or so much as shall be necessary, at the time and in the manner as the court of probate shall direct, to the payment of all the debts of his or her ward; but if the property shall be insufficient to pay the debts in full, then he or she shall pay the debts ratably; except that debts due to the United States, debts due to this state, and state and town taxes shall be paid first and in the order in which they are named. Every claim against the ward, allowed by the guardian or found due by judgment, shall be a lien upon the real estate of the ward during his or her minority and for one year thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-22.
Application of property to debts contracted during minority.

Whenever a guardian of the estate only is appointed, the property of the minor in the hands of the guardian shall not be chargeable with any debt against the minor contracted during the life of his or her father; but in case any part of the property of the minor is deemed necessary for his or her support or education, the property shall be paid out by the guardian for that purpose, under the advice and direction of the probate court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-23.
Sale or mortgage of real estate.

If the personal property in the hands of a guardian is insufficient to pay the debts of his or her ward, including incumbrances on his or her estate, and the expense of supporting him or her and his or her family, the guardian may be authorized by the probate court to sell, or to mortgage for an amount decreed, the real estate of his or her ward or any interest therein for the purpose of paying debts. A guardian may also be authorized to sell the real estate of his or her ward or any interest in the real estate for the purpose of making a better investment or for any other proper purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-24.
Sale of personal property.

A guardian may make application for the sale of the personal estate of his or her ward, or any of it, for better or more advantageous investment, or for the support of his or her ward and the ward’s family, or for any other purpose beneficial to the ward, and for incidental charges. The application may be granted by the court of probate without notice. The court shall prescribe the manner in which the property shall be advertised and sold, and, in case of a private sale, the minimum price. From the order granting the application, there shall be no appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-25.
Notice of disallowance of claims.

Within thirty (30) days after the expiration of the six (6) months, the guardian shall file in the office of the probate clerk a statement disallowing any of the claims filed as he or she intends to contest, and shall give notice in writing, either personally or by registered or certified mail, to claimants whose claims are disallowed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-26.
Period after notice of claims disallowances during which actions barred — Amount to which creditor entitled — Service on guardian.

No action shall be brought or prosecuted against any person under guardianship within seven (7) months after the first publication of the notice. A creditor shall be entitled to his or her whole claim if the estate is solvent, or a dividend if the estate should prove insolvent, upon any sum as he or she may be allowed to recover. The party bringing suit, in addition to the service of the original writ, shall cause a true copy of the notice to be served upon the guardian.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-27.
Investment of surplus funds — Relief from bond requirements.

Guardians may be authorized to invest any money in their hands, not needed for the payment of debts, or for the support or education of their wards, in notes secured by mortgage upon unencumbered, improved real estate situated in this state, or in the bonds or other indebtedness of the United States, or of this state, or in the bonds or notes of any city or town in this state, or in the stock of any domestic building and loan association or federal savings and loan association doing business in this state approved by the probate court, or to make deposits of money in any savings bank or trust company in this state approved by the probate court, as he or she shall deem best for the interest of his or her ward; and may also, under the direction of the probate court, invest any money in real estate or bank stocks in this state or in other safe income producing securities as the probate court may approve; and if a guardian has so deposited any money in any savings bank or trust company or invested the money in stock of any association and deposited with the clerk of the probate court the savings bankbook, share certificate or other evidence of the deposit or investment, to be held subject to the order of the court, the probate court in its discretion may relieve the guardian of the requirement of surety on his or her bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 299, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 419, § 2.

33-15.1-28.
General duties with respect to person and estate.

Every guardian of the person shall take suitable charge of the person over whom he or she shall be appointed guardian, and every guardian of the estate of another shall manage the same frugally and without waste, and shall apply the income and profits of the estate or so much as may be necessary and proper to the support and maintenance of the ward and his or her household or family.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-29.
Annual account.

A guardian shall return to the probate court, in every year, his or her account, in the same manner as executors and administrators are by law required to do, and upon neglect shall be cited by the court so to do; and upon failure to comply with the citation for thirty (30) days, without sufficient excuse, shall be accountable for the full value of the estate and property of his or her ward, and shall have no compensation; but the court may, upon the application of the guardian, excuse him or her from rendering an account in any year if satisfied that it is not necessary or expedient that it should be rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-30.
Responsibility of guardians for education of minors.

Guardians of minors shall take special charge of their education, and guardians appointed under the provisions of §

33-15-8

shall take like charge of the education of the children of their wards, unless guardians shall be appointed for those children; and the estates of wards, and also the estates of minors, shall be liable for the education of the children and minors aforesaid in the same manner as for their support and maintenance, and the estates may be sold or mortgaged for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-31.
Powers of guardian with respect to corporate stock.

Whenever the ward is the owner of stock in any corporation, the guardian shall have and exercise in behalf of his or her ward all the rights and powers of voting, either personally or by proxy, and the right of examination of books, incident to ownership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-32.
Support of dependents for whom ward has no legal obligation to provide.

Whenever a guardian or a conservator of any person or the estate of any person is appointed by any court in this state and that person has, prior to the appointment of the guardian or conservator, provided for any other person out of his or her estate, whom the person for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed was not under legal obligations to support or provide for, and where it appears that the person for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed would have continued the support or provision, if the guardian or conservator had not been appointed. The superior court, upon complaint filed by the person who received the support or provision, or by the guardian or conservator, may authorize the guardian or conservator to continue to make allowances out of the estate of the person for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed, as the court in its sound discretion deems the person for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed would have made if a guardian or conservator had not been appointed, provided, however, that the court shall not exercise the power in cases where the person for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed has prior to the appointment of a guardian or conservator expressly declared or requested that these powers shall not be exercised by the court. In granting this authority, the court may impose conditions or restrictions and give directions as it may deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-33.
Appeal to supreme court from proceedings under § 33-15.1-32.

An appeal may be taken to the supreme court from any final order, judgment or decree of the superior court from any final order, judgment or decree of the superior court entered in any proceeding brought under the provisions of §

33-15.1-32

at any time within twenty (20) days from the entry of the order, judgment or decree, and not thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-34.
Applicability of §§ 33-15.1-32 and 33-15.1-33.

The provisions of §§

33-15.1-32

and

33-15.1-33

shall apply to any estate where a guardian or conservator has been appointed whether prior to June 13th, 1923, or thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-35.
Removal of property by nonresident guardian.

In all cases where a guardian and his or her ward are both nonresidents in this state and his or her ward is entitled to property of any description in this state, the guardian, on producing satisfactory proof to the probate court of the town where any property is situated, by certificates duly authenticated according to an act of congress in those cases, that he or she has given bond and security in the state in which he or she and his or her ward reside in double the value of the property of the ward, and it is found that a removal of the property will not prejudice the interest of any other person in the property, then the guardian may demand, sue for, recover, and remove any property to the place of residence of himself or herself or his or her ward.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-36.
Order to resident guardian to deliver property to nonresident guardian.

Whenever a nonresident guardian shall produce an exemplification, under the seal, if any there be, of the proper court in the state of his or her residence, containing all the entries in relation to his or her appointment and in relation to his or her having given bond, duly authenticated as required by this chapter, the probate court of the proper town in this state may cause suitable orders to be made, discharging any resident guardian, executor, or administrator and authorizing the delivering and passing over of the property, and also requiring receipts to be passed and filed if deemed advisable: provided, that in all cases thirty (30) days’ notice shall be given to the resident guardian, executor, or administrator of the intended application for the order of removal, and the court may reject the application and refuse the order whenever it is satisfied it is for the interest of the ward or of any other person having a right in the property that the removal shall not take place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-37.
Removal of guardian — Resignation.

The court may remove any guardian appointed or approved by it who, by any reason of absence, sickness, insanity or other cause, shall become incapable of executing his or her trust, or who shall neglect or refuse to do the duties thereof, or who shall waste the estate of his or her ward, or who shall neglect or refuse to give a bond or sureties on his or her bond when ordered by the court. The court shall accept the resignation of any guardian after he or she has accounted with the court for the estate of his or her ward in his or her hands.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-38.
Allowances to guardians.

Probate courts are authorized to allow in the settlement of the accounts of any guardian any reasonable sums as the guardian shall have paid for the suitable support of his or her ward and family, and also a reasonable compensation to the guardian for his or her services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-39.
Action on guardian’s bond.

If a guardian shall neglect to return a true inventory of his or her ward’s estate or shall neglect to apply the real and personal estate of his or her ward to the payment of the ward’s debts, it shall be deemed a breach of his or her bond, and he or she and his or her sureties shall be liable for an action on the bond by any creditor or person interested, and judgment shall be entered in the action, execution shall issue, and recovery shall be had in like manner as on administration bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.

33-15.1-40.
Rights of parents or guardian to have children tested for substance abuse — Admissibility of results.

The parents or guardian of a minor child who resides with the parents or guardian shall have the authority to have the child tested for substance abuse, at the discretion of the parent or guardian. The results of any tests performed pursuant to this section shall not be admissible in any judicial proceeding, civil or criminal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 5.